Utah, session 2026, SB176.
Section 1. Section 63G-6a-111.1 is enacted to read:63G-6a-111.1. Requirements for landscape maintenance equipment.(1)As used in this section:(a)"Electric-powered" means operated using electricity as the primary power source.(b)(i)"Landscape maintenance" means routine care of outdoor vegetation and associated elements, including mulch, gravel, flower beds, and decorative barriers.(ii)"Landscape maintenance" includes mowing, edging, trimming, fertilizing, raking, and blowing.(c)"Landscape maintenance equipment" means any device that is primarily designed for the performance of landscape maintenance.(d)"State agency" means any unit of state government, including a department, division, office, or institution of higher education.(e)"State government facility" means a building, structure, or other improvement that is constructed on property owned by the state or a state agency.(f)"State government grounds" means the real property, whether fenced or unfenced, on which a state government facility is located.(2)Subject to Subsection (3), when a procurement unit procures new landscape maintenance equipment to replace end-of-life, two-stroke gasoline-powered landscape maintenance equipment to be used primarily on state government grounds, the procurement unit shall procure landscape maintenance equipment that is electric-powered if the state government grounds:(a)are located in a county of the first or second class, as classified under Section 17-60-104; and(b)consist of fewer than 50,000 square feet of property needing landscape maintenance.(3)The director of the Division of Facilities Construction and Management created in Section 63A-5b-301 may exempt a procurement unit, or a specific procurement transaction, from the requirements of Subsection (2) if:(a)using electric-powered landscape maintenance equipment is not practical due to the existing slope, erosion, stoniness, or other features of the landscape where the equipment is to be used;(b)there is an emergency and using electric-powered landscape maintenance equipment is impractical to maintaining the safe and operational condition of the property where the equipment is to be used; or(c)the director, in consultation with the procurement unit, makes a written finding that the requirements of Subsection (2) are cost-prohibitive.

Section 2:
Section 2.  Effective Date.This bill takes effect on May 6, 2026.